Wisconsin, session 2025, SB284.
do enact as follows:SB284,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes is amended to read:SB284,2,7271.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 3(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5i), (5j), (5k), 4(5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 5liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 6partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 771.34 (1k) (g).SB284,28Section 2. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB284,2,10971.07 (12) Sustainable aviation fuel production credit. (a) Definitions. 10In this subsection:SB284,2,11111. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB284,2,13122. “Energy crop” means a plant grown to produce biomass that can be 13converted into renewable energy.SB284,2,16143. “Sustainable aviation fuel” means aviation fuel of which at least 90 percent 15of the aviation fuel is derived from synthetic, renewable, and nonpetroleum sources, 16such as energy crops.SB284,2,2017(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2027, a 18claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the 19amount of the tax, an amount equal to $1.50 for each gallon of sustainable aviation 20fuel produced by the claimant in this state during the taxable year.SB284,2,2321(c) Limitations. 1. No credit under this subsection may be claimed for the 22production of a sustainable aviation fuel derived at least in part from energy crops 23unless the energy crops were grown within the United States.SB284,3,7242. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 1not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and the amount of, 2the credit are based on their investment of amounts under par. (b). A partnership, 3limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of 4credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall 5provide that information to each of them. Partners, members of limited liability 6companies, and shareholders of tax-option corporations may claim the credit in 7proportion to their ownership interests.SB284,3,98(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 9s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB284,310Section 3. 71.10 (4) (gm) of the statutes is created to read:SB284,3,111171.10 (4) (gm) Sustainable aviation fuel production credit under s. 71.07 (12).SB284,412Section 4. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB284,3,161371.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 1471.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 15(5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and passed through to 16partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.SB284,517Section 5. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB284,3,231871.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 19(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), 20(5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 21liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 22partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 23s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB284,624Section 6. 71.28 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB284,4,2171.28 (12) Sustainable aviation fuel production credit. (a) Definitions. 2In this subsection:SB284,4,331. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB284,4,542. “Energy crop” means a plant grown to produce biomass that can be 5converted into renewable energy.SB284,4,863. “Sustainable aviation fuel” means aviation fuel of which at least 90 percent 7of the aviation fuel is derived from synthetic, renewable, and nonpetroleum sources, 8such as energy crops.SB284,4,129(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2027, a 10claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.23, up to the 11amount of the tax, an amount equal to $1.50 for each gallon of sustainable aviation 12fuel produced by the claimant in this state during the taxable year.SB284,4,1513(c) Limitations. 1. No credit under this subsection may be claimed for the 14production of a sustainable aviation fuel derived at least in part from energy crops 15unless the energy crops were grown within the United States.SB284,4,23162. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 17not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and the amount of, 18the credit are based on their investment of amounts under par. (b). A partnership, 19limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of 20credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall 21provide that information to each of them. Partners, members of limited liability 22companies, and shareholders of tax-option corporations may claim the credit in 23proportion to their ownership interests.SB284,5,21(d) Administration. Subsection (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 2sub. (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB284,73Section 7. 71.30 (3) (dw) of the statutes is created to read:SB284,5,4471.30 (3) (dw) Sustainable aviation fuel production credit under s. 71.28 (12).SB284,85Section 8. 71.34 (1k) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB284,5,9671.34 (1k) (g) An addition shall be made for credits computed by a tax-option 7corporation under s. 71.28 (1dm), (1dx), (1dy), (3), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), 8(3wm), (3y), (4), (5), (5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and 9passed through to shareholders.SB284,910Section 9. 71.45 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is amended to read:SB284,5,171171.45 (2) (a) 10. By adding to federal taxable income the amount of credit 12computed under s. 71.47 (1dm) to (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3w), (3y), (5g), (5i), 13(5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a 14partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 15that amount to the partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option 16corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g) and the amount of credit 17computed under s. 71.47 (3), (3t), (4), (4m), and (5).SB284,1018Section 10. 71.47 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB284,5,201971.47 (12) Sustainable aviation fuel production credit. (a) Definitions. 20In this subsection:SB284,5,21211. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB284,5,23222. “Energy crop” means a plant grown to produce biomass that can be 23converted into renewable energy.SB284,6,2243. “Sustainable aviation fuel” means aviation fuel of which at least 90 percent 1of the aviation fuel is derived from synthetic, renewable, and nonpetroleum sources, 2such as energy crops.SB284,6,63(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2027, a 4claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.43, up to the 5amount of the tax, an amount equal to $1.50 for each gallon of sustainable aviation 6fuel produced by the claimant in this state during the taxable year.SB284,6,97(c) Limitations. 1. No credit under this subsection may be claimed for the 8production of a sustainable aviation fuel derived at least in part from energy crops 9unless the energy crops were grown within the United States.SB284,6,17102. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 11not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and the amount of, 12the credit are based on their investment of amounts under par. (b). A partnership, 13limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of 14credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall 15provide that information to each of them. Partners, members of limited liability 16companies, and shareholders of tax-option corporations may claim the credit in 17proportion to their ownership interests.SB284,6,1918(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 19s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB284,1120Section 11. 71.49 (1) (dw) of the statutes is created to read:SB284,6,212171.49 (1) (dw) Sustainable aviation fuel production credit under s. 71.47 (12).SB284,6,2222